Tennessee, session 114, SB0801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-5-106, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
On or before January 1 of each year, the board shall submit a report to the
governor and the legislative librarian on the board's proceedings and activities from the
previous calendar year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0801
002826
- 1 -